Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 32 Cell Phone Tracking

12-32-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adverse result” means:

Endangering the life or physical safety of an individual;

Flight from prosecution;

Destruction of, or tampering with, evidence;

Intimidation of potential witnesses; or

Otherwise seriously jeopardizing an investigation or unduly delaying a trial.

“Electronic device” means any device that enables access to, or use of, an electronic communication service (as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2510(15)), remote computing service (as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 2711(2)), or location information service.

“Location information” means any information concerning the location of an electronic device that, in whole or in part, is generated by, or derived from, the operation of that device.

“Location information service” means a global positioning service or other mapping, locational, or directional information service.

“Service provider” means the provider of an electronic communications service, remote computing service, or location information service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1.

12-32-2.
Requirement for warrant.

No agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, shall obtain location information without a warrant unless a warrant requirement exception applies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1.

12-32-3.
Notice.

Unless delayed under subsection (b), notice to the affected customer or subscriber is required not later than five (5) days after an agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, receives location information under this chapter that is obtained with or without a warrant; provided no notice shall be required if the location information was obtained pursuant to §

12-32-4(a)

. The agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, shall serve the following upon, or deliver to, the affected customer or subscriber by registered mail, or first-class mail, or electronic mail, or any other means permitted by the court issuing the warrant to be as effective:

A copy of the warrant, if applicable; and

A statement of the general nature of the law enforcement inquiry; and

If applicable, an affirmation that location information maintained by a service provider was supplied to a law enforcement officer; and

If such location information was obtained, an identification of the service provider from which the information was obtained; and

If applicable, a statement indicating the identifying number associated with the electronic device; and

If applicable, the dates for which the location information was supplied; and

A statement of whether notification of such customer(s) or subscriber(s) was delayed pursuant to subsection (b); and

If applicable, an identification of the court that made the certification or determination pursuant to which that delay was made.

Delay of notification. An agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, acting under this chapter may include in the application a request for an order delaying the notification required pursuant to this section for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days, and the court shall issue the order if the court determines that there is reason to believe that notification of the existence of the warrant may have an adverse result.

Upon expiration of the period of delay granted under this section, the agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, shall provide the affected customer(s) or subscriber(s) a copy of the warrant, together with any notice required.

Preclusion of notice to subject of governmental access. An agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, acting under this chapter may include in the application a request for an order directing a service provider to which a warrant is directed not to notify any other person of the existence of the warrant for a period of not more than ninety (90) days, and the court shall issue the order if the court determines that there is reason to believe that notification of the existence of the warrant may have an adverse result.

The court may, upon application, grant one or more extensions of orders granted under this chapter for an additional ninety (90) days.

Failure to comply with the notice provisions shall not be grounds for the suppression of any evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1.

12-32-4.
Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, may obtain location information from a service provider without obtaining a warrant under the following circumstances:

In order to respond to the user’s call for emergency services;

In order to respond to a call for emergency services, including a request from an E-911 supervisor to determine the location of a cellular telephone, when required pursuant to an emergency involving actual or potential death, serious physical injury, or major damage to property and the information is needed without delay;

If an agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, believes that an emergency involving immediate danger of death or serious physical injury to any person requires the obtaining of information relating to the emergency without delay, and/or pursuant to the Kelsey Smith Act, as codified in §

39-2-20

;

If the location information was generated by an electronic device used as a condition of release from a penal institution, as a condition of pre-trial release, probation, conditional discharge, parole, mandatory supervised release, or other sentencing order;

With the express consent of the owner or user of the electronic communications device concerned;

With the express, informed consent of the parent or foster parent of a minor who is the owner or user, or the legal guardian or next of kin of the owner or user, if the owner or user is believed to be deceased or reported missing and unable to be contacted;

If the electronic device is reported lost or stolen by the owner or user of the electronic device; or

If the government entity is the owner of the electronic device and has issued it to an employee or it is attached to property owned by the government entity.

Not later than five (5) days after the date on which an agent of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, obtains access to records under this section, a governmental entity shall file with the appropriate court a signed, sworn statement of a supervisory official of a rank designated by the head of the governmental entity setting forth the grounds for the access to information in this section. Should the courts not be open upon the expiration of the five (5) days, the statement shall be filed the next day the court is open to receive such statement.

When location information is sought pursuant to this chapter, and unless otherwise permitted by a warrant, any acquisition of information shall immediately terminate when the location information sought is obtained.

In the event an application for a warrant is denied, or in any other case where the interception is made or terminated without a warrant having been issued where required by this chapter, notice shall be served to all owners or known users of electronic devices about which location information was acquired in violation of this chapter.

The notice required by §

12-32-3

shall also be provided when location information is obtained pursuant to subdivisions (a)(2) or (a)(3).

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit law enforcement from obtaining, without a court order, location information when the information, including metadata attached to images and video, is otherwise publicly available on a social networking website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1.

12-32-5.
Reporting requirements.

By January 31 of each calendar year, each law enforcement agency that collected any location information from electronic devices in the previous calendar year shall issue a report identifying the number of warrants issued for location information for an electronic device that were approved and denied in the previous year, including:

The identity of the agency making the application; and

The offense specified in the warrant or application therefor; and

The number of warrants granted, in full or in part, and the number denied; and

The number and duration of any extensions of the warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 5.

12-32-6.
Immunity from liability.

No cause of action shall lie in any court against a service provider or such provider’s officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons, for providing information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of any court order, warrant, or for providing information in reliance on representations by law enforcement that the location information may be obtained without a warrant pursuant to §

12-32-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 411, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 412, § 1.